Maryland, session 2025, SB0001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
9–302.
(b) (2) (i) In this paragraph, “legally protected health care” has the
meaning stated in § 2–312 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(ii) A judge may not order a person within the State to give testimony
or a statement, or produce documents, electronically stored information, or other tangible
things under this subsection, in a case where prosecution is pending, or where a grand jury
investigation has commenced or is about to commence, for a violation of a criminal law of
another state involving the provision of, receipt of, or assistance with legally protected
health care in the State, unless the acts forming the basis of the prosecution or investigation
would constitute a crime in this State.
9–402.
(a) (1) In this subsection, “legally protected health care” has the meaning
stated in § 2–312 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.

SENATE BILL 1 3
(2) (i) To request issuance of a subpoena under this section, a party
shall submit a foreign subpoena to a clerk of the circuit court for the county in which
discovery is sought to be conducted in this State.
(ii) The request under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall
include a sworn, written statement signed under penalty of perjury by the party seeking
enforcement, or the party’s counsel, that no portion of the subpoena is intended or
anticipated to further any investigation or proceeding related to legally protected health
care, unless the out–of–state proceeding is:
1. Based in tort, contract, or statute;
2. A claim for which a similar or equivalent claim would exist
in the State; and
3. A. Brought by the patient who received legally
protected health care, or the patient’s legal representative; or
B. Based on conduct that would be prohibited under the laws
of this State.
(3) A request for the issuance of a subpoena under this subtitle does not
constitute an appearance in the courts of this State.
10–408.
(c) (5) (i) In this paragraph, “legally protected health care” has the
meaning stated in § 2–312 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(ii) A judge may not issue an ex parte order under this section for
the purpose of investigating or recovering evidence of actions related to legally protected
health care, unless the acts forming the basis for the investigation or recovery of evidence
would constitute a crime in this State.
11–802.
(a) (1) In this subsection, “legally protected health care” has the meaning
stated under § 2–312 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, a copy of any foreign judgment authenticated in accordance with an act of
Congress or statutes of this State may be filed in the office of the clerk of a circuit court.
(ii) If the face amount of the judgment is $2,500 or less, the copy
shall be filed with the clerk of the District Court.

SENATE BILL 1
(iii) If the face amount of the judgment is not more than a
jurisdictional amount described in § 4–401 of this article, but more than $2,500, the copy
may be filed either with the clerk of the District Court or in the office of the clerk of a circuit
court.
(iv) Except as required by federal law, a judgment creditor may not
file a copy of any foreign judgment under this section if the judgment was issued in
connection with any litigation concerning legally protected health care, unless the
underlying cause of action is:
1. Based in tort, contract, or statute;
2. A claim for which a similar or equivalent claim would exist
in the State; and
3. A. Brought by the patient who received legally
protected health care, or the patient’s legal representative; or
B. Based on conduct that would be prohibited under the laws
of this State.
(3) The clerk shall treat the foreign judgment in the same manner as a
judgment of the court in which the foreign judgment is filed.
Article – Criminal Procedure
9–106.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “legally protected health care services” has the
meaning stated in § 2–312 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(2) Unless compelled by a writ of mandamus issued by a federal court, the
Governor may not surrender a person on demand of the executive authority of any other
state if the alleged act for which surrender is being demanded relates to providing,
procuring, or aiding another in providing or procuring legally protected health care services
and the act would not be a crime in the State.
Article – Family Law
5–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Assisted reproduction” means a method of causing pregnancy other
than sexual intercourse.
(2) “Assisted reproduction” includes:

SENATE BILL 1 5
(i) intrauterine or intracervical insemination;
(ii) donation of gametes;
(iii) donation of embryos;
(iv) in–vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos; and
(v) intracytoplasmic sperm injection.
Article – Health – General
4–208.
(a) In this section, “gestational carrier” means a woman other than an intended
parent or gamete donor who agrees to become pregnant for an intended parent with the
intention of gestating and delivering the child of the intended parent.
Article – Health Occupations
1–227.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Health care practitioner” means an individual who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by law to provide health care services under this article.
(3) “Legally protected health care” has the meaning stated in § 2–312 of
the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(b) A health occupations board may not revoke, suspend, discipline, take an
adverse action against, or refuse to issue or renew a license, certification, or other
authorization to practice for any health care practitioner in whole or in part because of the
provision or support of the provision of legally protected health care if the legally protected
health care was provided in accordance with the standard of care as determined by the
relevant health occupations board established under this article and in accordance with the
laws of this State.
(c) A health occupations board may not revoke, suspend, discipline, take an
adverse action against, or refuse to issue or renew a license, certification, or other
authorization to practice for any health care practitioner if the health care practitioner is
disciplined by a licensure board in another state in whole or in part because of the provision
or support of the provision of legally protected health care if the legally protected health
care was provided in accordance with the standard of care as determined by the relevant
health occupations board established under this article and in accordance with the laws of
this State.

SENATE BILL 1
Article – Insurance
15–810.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) (i) “Standard fertility preservation procedures” means procedures
to preserve fertility that are consistent with established medical practices and professional
guidelines published by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the American
College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, or the American Society of Clinical Oncology.
(ii) “Standard fertility preservation procedures” includes sperm and
oocyte cryopreservation and evaluations, laboratory assessments, medications, and
treatments associated with sperm and oocyte cryopreservation.
(iii) “Standard fertility preservation procedures” does not include the
storage of sperm or oocytes.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
2–312.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ASSISTED REPRODUCTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
5–1001 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE.
(3) “CONTRACEPTIVE” MEANS A DRUG, DEVICE, OR BIOLOGICAL
PRODUCT INTENDED FOR USE IN THE PREVENTION OF PREGNANCY, WHETHER
SPECIFICALLY INTENDED TO PREVENT PREGNANCY OR FOR ANY OTHER HEALTH
NEED, THAT IS APPROVED, CLEARED, AUTHORIZED, OR LICENSED UNDER 21 U.S.C.
§ 355, § 360(K), § 360C(F)(2), § 360E, OR § 360BBB–3 OR 42 U.S.C. § 262.
[(2)] (4) “Gender–affirming treatment” has the meaning stated in §
15–151 of the Health – General Article.
(5) “GESTATIONAL CARRIER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–208
OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
[(3)] (6) “Legally protected health care” means:
(i) all reproductive health services, medications, and supplies
related to the direct provision or support of the provision of care related to pregnancy,
[contraception] CONTRACEPTIVES, assisted reproduction, and abortion that is lawful in
the State, INCLUDING:

SENATE BILL 1 7
1. ALL ASSISTED REPRODUCTION TREATMENT AND
STANDARD FERTILITY PRESERVATION PROCEDURES, INCLUDING MEDICATIONS,
SUPPLIES, AND THE USE OF GESTATIONAL CARRIERS, RELATED TO THE DIRECT
PROVISION OR SUPPORT OF THE PROVISION OF CARE RELATED TO ASSISTED
REPRODUCTION OR STANDARD FERTILITY PRESERVATION PROCEDURES THAT IS
LAWFUL IN THE STATE; AND
2. ALL CONTRACEPTIVE SERVICES, INCLUDING
MEDICATIONS, SUPPLIES, AND SURGICAL PROCEDURES, RELATED TO THE DIRECT
PROVISION OR SUPPORT OF THE PROVISION OF CARE RELATED TO CONTRACEPTIVE
SERVICES THAT IS LAWFUL IN THE STATE; or
(ii) all gender–affirming treatment, including medications and
supplies, related to the direct provision or support of the provision of care related to
gender–affirming treatment that is lawful in the State.
(7) “STANDARD FERTILITY PRESERVATION PROCEDURES” HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 15–810.1 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(b) This section does not apply to an interstate investigation or proceeding
described under subsection (c) of this section if:
(1) the interstate investigation or proceeding concerns conduct that would
be subject to civil liability, criminal liability, or administrative sanction if committed in the
State; or
(2) the subject of the interstate investigation or proceeding submits a
written request to provide information or assistance to the investigation or proceeding.
(c) An agency of the State or a political subdivision of the State, an agent or
employee of the State or a political subdivision of the State acting in the agent’s or
employee’s official capacity, or a private party providing services on behalf of the State or
a political subdivision of the State, may not provide information, expend time or money, or
use State facilities, State property, State equipment, State personnel, or other State
resources in furtherance of any interstate investigation or proceeding seeking to impose
civil or criminal liability on, or administrative sanction against, a person for any activity
relating to legally protected health care if the activity would not be subject to civil or
criminal liability or professional sanction in the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.